Louisiana, session 2026, HB1099.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Aerospace flight entities and activities; prohibition of suit
A. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Aerospace flight activities" mean any act or activity related to the
research, development, testing, manufacture, preparation, launch, operation, reentry,
descent, landing, or post-landing recovery of a launch vehicle, craft, payload, or
related equipment, including but not limited to, fueling, integration, conditioning,
transport, and any associated ground support operations, whether conducted on-site
or involving overflight.
(2) "Aerospace flight entity" means any person, corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or any other entity that conducts space flight activities
and, to the extent required by federal law, holds or operates anywhere under a valid
Federal Aviation Administration license, experimental permit, or other authorization
for the relevant activities requiring such a license. This also includes any employee,
officer, director, agent, contractor, manufacturer, supplier, or vendor of such entity,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2727 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1099
any owner or lessor of real property used for space flight activities, and any political
subdivision or public entity with a contractual or operational relationship facilitating
such activities.
B. Temporary restraining orders, preliminary injunctions, permanent
injunctions, abatement orders, or other equitable relief that would delay, restrict,
modify, or prohibit any aerospace flight activities shall be null and void. Any claim
brought against an aerospace flight entity that arises from any aerospace flight
activities is subject to a motion to strike pursuant to Code of Civil Procedure Article
971.
C. Claims seeking damages for interference with the use or enjoyment of
property, emotional distress, diminution in property value, or any other loss that
would be recoverable in an action for nuisance or trespass shall be barred if the claim
arises from aerospace flight activities.
D. A reciprocal waiver of claims between parties engaged in aerospace flight
activities under Federal Aviation Regulations (14 C.F.R. §440.17) is effective and
enforceable in this state, including waiver by a contractor, subcontractor, or customer
of any party participating in an aerospace flight activity.
E. An aerospace flight entity is presumed to be acting lawfully if the
aerospace activity is conducted with substantial compliance with applicable federal,
state, and local licenses, permits, or authorizations.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2727 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1099